dictsource/lv_rules
// Translation rules for Latvian and Latgalian
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
// ?2 — pronunciation rules for Latgalian

.replace
      ó    ȯ                    // replace o-acute with o-dot, as it is more logical for "short o"
      ḩ    h
// +---------------------------+
// |     Suffixes of nouns     |
// +---------------------------+

.L01  s š a am u ā i iem us os   // suffixes for masculine words finishing with -s or -š (1. declination)
.L02  is a im i ī u iem us os    // suffixes for masculine words finishing with -is (2. declination)
.L03  us um u ū i iem os         // suffixes for masculine words finishing with -us (3. declination)
.L04  a as ai ā u ām ās          // suffixes for feminine words finishing with -a  (4. declination)
.L05  e es ei i ē u ēm ēs        // suffixes for feminine words finishing with -e  (5. declination)
.L06  s ij i ī is u īm īs        // suffixes for feminine words finishing with -s  (6. declination)

.L07  iem os i u                 // suffixes for plural masculine words finishing with -i
.L08  as u ām ās                 // suffixes for plural feminine words finishing with -as
.L09  es u ēm ēs                 // suffixes for plural feminine words finishing with -es

// +---------------------------+
// |    Suffixes of verbs      |
// +---------------------------+

.L11  āt bt ēt gt īt kt lt mt ot pt rt st ut ūt zt // infinitive suffixes of direct verbs
.L12  t ti ties                                    // suffixes of reflective verbs
.L13  a am at ām āt i iet im it ot t u             // suffixes of direct verbs (without ..im, because of .L02)
.L14  amies as aties āmies ās āties ies imies ities ieties os  // suffixes for reflective verbs

// +---------------------------+
// |      Other suffixes       |
// +---------------------------+

.L15  a ai am as ā ām ās i iem o os s u us         // suffixes of uncertain adjectives (nenoteiktie īpašības vārdi)
.L16  ajai ajā ajām ajās ajiem ajos ā ās ie o os   // suffixes of certain adjectives (noteiktie īpašības vārdi)
.L17  ai ais am ā ām ās ie iem o os                // suffixes of certain adjectives finishing with ..ējais
.L18  am āk i u ot ēt os                           // suffixes of adverbs (apstākļa vārdi)

.L30  ~ at ie iz jā jā jāat jāie jāiz jāno jāsa ne no pa pār pie sa vis // optional verb prefixes
.L31  ~ ne                                         // optional negation prefix
.L32  ~ ie ne sa vis visne                         // optional prefixes for adjectives
.L33  ~ ār iekš civil ie eks komerc kop liel līdz nam pār pārpa pie privāt sa uz valsts māj // optional prefixes for nouns


// +---------------------------+
// | Pronunciation of e and ē  |
// +---------------------------+

// E narrowers
.L21  i ī ie ei y                      // vowel narrowers of e
.L22  č ģ j k ļ ņ ŗ š ž dž bj pj mj vj // consonant narrowers of e
.L23  s i m                            // remaining ending of the 2. and 5. decl. words
.L27  č e ē f ģ h ḩ i ī j k ļ ņ q ŗ š w x y ž ei ie iu // all narrowers of e
// Also: .L41 — international consonants and diphthongs as a narrowers of e/ē

// E wideners
.L24  a ā u ū ai au                    // vowel wideners of e
                                       // by language rules o should be also included,
                                       // but it is mixed with ȯ and ō
.L25  b c d g ķ l m n p r s t v z dz   // consonant wideners of e
.L28  a ā b c d e ē g ķ l m n p r s t u ū v z ai au // all wideners of e


// +---------------------------+
// |     Pronunciation of o    |
// +---------------------------+

// Default rules for o with succeeding consonants
.L40  č ģ ķ ļ ņ ŗ š ž                  // uo indicators — o is spelled as uo in words with Latvian soft consonants
.L41  eo f h ḩ ia io iē y q w x        // o indicators — o is spelled as ȯ in words with Latin letters, also narrowers of e/ē
.L42  e i o ng                         // o prefixes (no a, because of sao.., pao... where o is uo)
.L43  lg ng rb zn ļš ss                // o postfixes
.L44  gļ kļ šņ jā                      // uo postfixes

.L45  b c č d g ģ j k ķ l ļ m n ņ p r ŗ s š t v z ž // non-o/ō consonants
.L46  ā ē ī ū                          // uo indicator vowels

// +---------------------------+
// |       Vowel groups        |
// +---------------------------+

.L50  a ā                              // short/long vowels grouped together
.L51  e ē
.L52  i ī
.L53  u ū
.L54  o ō
.L55  a e i u o                        // short vowels icluding o
.L56  a e i u                          // short vowels without o
.L57  ā ē ī ū ō                        // long vowels including ō
.L58  ā ē ī ū                          // long vowels without ō
.L59  ae ai ei ie io iu oi ui uo       // Dipthongs

// +---------------------------+
// |    Consonant groups       |
// +---------------------------+

.L60  b d dz dž g ģ j l ļ m n ņ r v z ž // voiced (loud) consonants
.L61  p t k ķ c č s š f h ḩ             // unvoiced (silent) consonants
.L62  b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z // hard consonants
.L63  č ģ ḩ ķ ļ ņ ŗ š ž                       // soft consonants
.L64  s t
.L65  t d j s š                              // root endings for verbs and adjectives
.L66  g ģ
.L67  k ķ
.L68  n r
.L69  k s

//      consonant alternation
.L70  b bj      // urbis - urbja
.L71  c č       // lācis - lāča, pūce - pūču
.L72  d ž       // briedis - brieža, priede - priežu
.L73  dz dž     // dadzis - dadža, redze - redžu
.L74  g dz      // augt - audz - audziet
.L75  k c       // braukt - brauc - brauciet
.L76  d z       // -dzētu, -dētu
.L77  l ļ       // sīlis - sīļa, sile - siļu
.L78  ln ļņ     // cilnis - ciļņa
.L79  m mj      // zeme - zemju
.L80  n ņ       // zirnis - zirņa, sēne - sēņu
.L81  p pj      // ziepes - ziepju
.L82  r ŗ       // teteris - teteŗa
.L83  s š       // lasis - laša, puse - pušu, pāksts - pākšu
.L84  sl šļ     // kāpslis - kāpšļa
.L85  sn šņ     // atkusnis - atkušņa
.L86  d s t     // veda - vest, meta - mest
.L87  d t z     // meta - mezdams, veda - vezdams
.L88  š t       // zutis - zuša, bite - bišu
.L89  v vj      // kareivis - kareivja.
.L90  z ž       // vēzis - vēža, roze - rožu
.L91  zl žļ     // zizlis - zižļa
.L92  zn žņ     // zvaigzne - zvaigžņu
.L93  s z

// +---------------------------+
// |   Pronunciation groups    |
// +---------------------------+

.group a
           a               a
           a (A            a_|
           ai              ai
           aie             a_!ie    // a-ie is more frequent than ai-e
           au              au
    _L32v) aja             a`ja` 
    _L33v) aja             a`ja` 
       _v) aj              a`j

.group ā
           ā               a:
           ā (A            a:_!
        C) ā (k            a::

.group b
           b               b

.group c
           c               ts
           c (C            ts_!

.group č
           č               tS

.group d
           d               d
           dz              Dz`
           dz (L57         Dz`_|
           dž              DZ`
           dž (L57         DZ`_|
           dž (L61         DZ

.group e
           e               e         // Default as narrow e
           ee              e_|e      // internationalisms, prefix: ne-e...
           ei (++          ei

    // narrow e ---------------------------------------------------------------------- //
           a) e (ro            e     // internationalisms
           e (o                e
                                     // international consonants
           e (JL41+            e
           e (L41+++           e
     L41J) e (+                e

                                     // narrowing vowels follow
           e (Cinā             e
           e (CCinā            e
           e (CCCinā           e
           e (CCCCL21          e
           e (CCCL21           e
           e (CCL21            e
           e (CL21             e
                                     // narrowing consonants follow
           e (L22++            e
           e (L22L22+          e
                                     // narrow endings
        @) e (_                e
        @) e (L12_             e     // -et, -eties
        @) e (L22L06_          e
        @) e (L22L12_          e
        @) e (L22L22L06_       e
        @) e (L23_             e     // -es, -ei, -em of 2. and 5. decl. words
        @) e (rA_              e
        @) e (rL02_            e     // -ris
        @) e (rL05_            e     // -re

           e (CL05_            e     // 5. decl. words
           e (CCL05_<          e
           e (CCCL05_<<        e
           e (JL05_+           e

    // wide e ------------------------------------------------------------------------ //
                                     // widening consonants follow
           e (L25<             E
           e (L25L25           E
                                     // widening vowels follow
           e (L25L24+          E
           e (L25L25L24        E
           e (L25L25L25L24     E
           e (L25L25L25L25L24  E
                                     // widening endings
           e (L01_             E
           e (L25L01_          E
           e (L25L25L01_       E
           e (Jam              E
      L25) e (CJL18_           E     // vareni etc.
